Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
PART 2
OFFENDERS SENTENCED FOR CRIMES COMMITTED
PRIOR TO JULY 1, 1979

17-22.5-201. Good time credit allowable.

Unless otherwise provided by law, every inmate confined in a correctional facility of the department who has committed no infraction of the rules or regulations of the department or the laws of the state and who performs in a faithful, diligent, industrious, orderly, and peaceable manner the work, duties, and tasks assigned to him to the satisfaction of the executive director or any of his designees may be allowed time credit reductions as follows: A deduction of two months in each of the first two years, four months in each of the next two years, and five months in each of the remaining years of his term of confinement, and correspondingly for any part of the year if such term of confinement is for less than a year. The mode of computing credits shall be as follows:

To those inmates whom the executive director or any of his designees may designate as trusties and who conduct themselves in accordance with departmental rules and perform their work in a creditable manner, upon approval of the executive director or any of his designees, additional good time to that allowed in the table set forth in subsection (1) of this section, not to exceed ten days in any one calendar month, shall be credited upon the time remaining to be served, such credit to be allowed only upon the actual number of months served in each year in a correctional facility of the department.

The executive director or any of his designees may grant to any inmate confined in a correctional facility additional good time credit to that allowed under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, not to exceed five days per month for each calendar year remaining to be served, for the following reasons:

Meritorious service by an inmate; or

Outstanding performance of assigned tasks in correctional industries.

The executive director or any of his designees may restore to the credit of any inmate confined in a correctional facility all or any portion of good time credits which have been forfeited by the inmate as a result of any disciplinary action or provision of law.

The provisions of this section shall apply to a defendant whose sentence was stayed pending appeal prior to July 1, 1972, but who was confined pending disposition of the appeal. Such credit shall be against the maximum and minimum terms of his sentence for the entire period of confinement served while the stay of execution was in effect.

A defendant whose sentence is stayed pending appeal after July 1, 1972, but who is confined pending disposition of the appeal is entitled to the credit provided by this section against the maximum and minimum terms of his sentence for the entire period of confinement served while the stay of execution was in effect.

If any inmate assaults any keeper, guard, foreman, officer, inmate, or other person, or threatens or endangers the person or life of anyone, or violates or disregards any departmental rule or regulation, or neglects or refuses to do the work to which he is assigned, or is guilty of any misconduct, or violates any of the rules or regulations governing parole, the department may order the forfeiture of all time credits theretofore earned by or allowed to him before the commission of such offense under this section.

Number of

Good time

Total good

Time to be served
yrs. of

that may be

time that may

if full credits are
sentence

earned

be earned

earned and allowed

1st year
2 months
2 months
10 months
2nd year
2 months
4 months
1 year 8 months
3rd year
4 months
8 months
2 years 4 months
4th year
4 months
1 year
3 years
5th year
5 months
1 year 5 months
3 years 7 months
6th year
5 months
1 year 10 months
4 years 2 months
7th year
5 months
2 years 3 months
4 years 9 months
8th year
5 months
2 years 8 months
5 years 4 months
9th year
5 months
3 years 1 month
5 years 11 months
10th year
5 months
3 years 6 months
6 years 6 months

and so continuing through as many years as may be the time of confinement.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 518, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 17-20-107 as it existed prior to 1984.

17-22.5-202. Ticket to leave - discharge - clothes, money, transportation - reentry services.

Ten days prior to the date on which any inmate confined in a correctional facility is entitled to be discharged or to be paroled from said correctional facility, the executive director or the executive director's designee shall give such inmate a ticket of leave therefrom, which shall entitle the inmate to depart from said correctional facility. The executive director or the executive director's designee shall at the same time furnish such inmate with suitable clothing and may furnish transportation, at the expense of the state, from the place at which said correctional facility is located to the place of the inmate's residence in Colorado, or any other place in Colorado. The executive director or the executive director's designee shall also furnish to any inmate being discharged, other than a parolee, one hundred dollars. The executive director or the executive director's designee may furnish any inmate being released on parole a reasonable sum of money not to exceed one hundred dollars; except that, if the executive director or the executive director's designee furnishes less than one hundred dollars, the difference between one hundred dollars and the amount furnished shall be credited to an account for such parolee. Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection (1), if the inmate has previously been returned to custody in a correctional facility after being paroled and before the completion of his or her period of parole and previously received such sum of money, the executive director or the executive director's designee shall not furnish a sum of money to the inmate. The executive director or the executive director's designee shall certify any amount so credited to the division of adult parole, and any such amount shall be distributed to an inmate in accordance with rules promulgated by the department.

An inmate furnished with a ticket of leave for discharge shall be deemed to be fully discharged from the sentence upon which he was confined at the end of said ten-day period.

Prior to the release from a correctional facility by discharge or parole of any person imprisoned for the commission of a child abuse offense which occurred within the state of Colorado, the executive director shall:

Notify the Colorado bureau of investigation of:

The identity of the offender; and

The anticipated release date of the offender; and

The last-known home address of the offender; and

The parole address of the offender; and

The results of a chemical test of a sex offender's biological substance sample in accordance with paragraph (b.5) of this subsection (3);

Notify the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the last-known home address of the offender of:

The identity of the offender; and

The last-known home address of the offender; and

The anticipated release date of the offender; and

The parole address of the offender;

On and after July 1, 1994, direct appropriate personnel with the department of corrections to require any offender who is released from the custody of the department of corrections having completed serving a sentence for an offense involving unlawful sexual behavior or for which the factual basis involved unlawful sexual behavior as defined in section 16-22-102 (9), C.R.S., who is under their jurisdiction to sign a notice that informs the offender of the duty to register with local law enforcement agencies in accordance with the provisions of article 22 of title 16, C.R.S. The same persons, after obtaining a signed notice from an offender, shall notify local law enforcement agencies where the offender plans to reside of the offender's address within forty-eight hours after an offender has been placed on parole or probation when such an address is provided in the signed notice. Department of corrections personnel shall provide such notice no later than two days before the offender is to be released from the department of corrections.

Repealed.

The department may use reasonable force to obtain a biological substance sample in accordance with section 16-11-102.4, C.R.S. In addition, any person who refuses to comply with section 16-11-102.4, C.R.S., may be denied parole, or, if such person has been granted parole, such parole may be revoked.

Notify the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the parole address of the offender if the parole address is not the same as the last-known home address of the offender of:

The identity of the offender; and

The anticipated release date of the offender; and

The last-known home address of the offender; and

The parole address of the offender;

Notify the victim or victims individually or through those persons with whom they reside of:

The identity of the offender; and

The anticipated release date of the offender; and

The last-known home address of the offender; and

The parole address of the offender;

Check with the Colorado bureau of investigation to determine whether there are any outstanding warrants for the arrest of any person confined for the commission of a Colorado child abuse offense and about to be released from a correctional facility, and, if so, said release shall be into the custody of the law enforcement agency issuing the warrant.

(3.5) Repealed.

If the victim of a child abuse crime under section 18-6-401, C.R.S., or a relative of the victim, if the victim has died or is a minor or is incapacitated, or any person requested by the victim to receive notice has requested notice from the parole board of any parole proceedings pursuant to section 17-2-214, relative to the person convicted of said crime, the executive director shall not be required to provide duplicate notice under paragraph (d) of subsection (3) of this section.

The notice to the victim pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection (3) of this section shall be sent by the department to the last-known address in the possession of the department, and the victim of the crime or a relative of the victim, if the victim has died or is a minor or is incapacitated, or any person requested by the victim to receive notice has the duty to keep the department informed of his or her most current address.

A person discharged from a correctional facility without supervision is eligible to receive reentry support services from the department or community-based organizations that receive funding from the department to provide reentry services for up to one year after the person's date of discharge.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 519, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(3) and (4) added, p. 688, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(3)(b.5) added, p. 1739, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(3)(a) and (3)(b.5) amended, p. 880, § 18, effective May 24.

L. 96:

(3)(b.5)(I) and (3)(b.5)(II) amended, p. 1585, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 26, § 1, effective March 20.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 852, § 61, effective May 24; (3.5) added, p. 1027, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(3)(b.5)(II) amended, p. 957, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(3)(a), (3)(b.5), and (3.5) amended, p.1152, § 9, effective July 1; (3)(b.5)(I) and (3)(b.5)(II) amended, p.1185, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3.5) amended, p. 1990, § 31, effective May 22.

L. 2006:

(3)(b.5)(II)(B) and (3.5)(b) added by revision, pp. 1689, 1693, §§ 7, 17.

L. 2007:

(3)(b.5)(III) amended, p. 2028, § 34, effective June 1.

L. 2019:

(5) added, (SB 19-143), ch. 286, p. 2659, § 4, effective May 28.

17-22.5-203. Time of parole not considered when inmate is reincarcerated.

The paroled inmate, upon an order of the state board of parole, may be returned to the custody of the department according to the terms of his original sentence, and, in computing the period of his confinement, the time between his release and his return to said custody shall not be considered any part of the term of his sentence.

Parole shall not be construed in any sense to operate as a discharge of any inmate paroled under the provisions of law but simply a permit to any such inmate to go outside a correctional facility; and, if, while so at large, he behaves and conducts himself as not to incur his reincarceration, he shall be deemed to be still serving out the sentence imposed upon him by the court and shall be entitled to good time the same as if he had not been paroled, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section. If the said paroled inmate is returned to the department, he shall serve out his original sentence, as provided for in this part 2.

No inmate released on parole on or after July 1, 1981, shall be entitled to a good time deduction from his sentence while on parole. In the event that his parole is revoked, he shall become eligible for any good time deductions authorized pursuant to this article on the date he is returned to the custody of the department.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 520, § 1, effective July 1.